Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Meetings and Action of the Board

§ 17-16-820.
Meetings.

The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings within or outside of this state.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication, including electronic transmission by which all directors participating may communicate with each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2005, ch. 51, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), inserted “including electronic transmission” after “means of communication.”

§ 17-16-821.
Action without meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, action required or permitted by this act to be taken at a board of directors’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by the requisite number of members of the board. The action shall be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by the requisite number of directors, or shall be sent by electronic transmission by the requisite number of directors, and shall be included in the minutes or filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken.

Action taken under this section is the act of the board of directors when one (1) or more consents signed by the requisite number of directors are delivered to the corporation. The consent may specify the time at which the action taken thereunder is to be effective. A director’s consent may be withdrawn by a revocation signed by the director and delivered to the corporation prior to delivery to the corporation of unrevoked written consents signed by the requisite number of directors. If action is taken by less than unanimous written consent of the directors, the corporation shall give the nonconsenting or nonvoting directors written notice of the action not more than ten (10) days after written consents sufficient to take the action have been delivered to the corporation. The notice shall reasonably describe the action taken. The requirement to give the notice shall not delay the effectiveness of actions taken by the written consent, and a failure to comply with the notice requirements shall not invalidate actions taken by written consent, provided that this subsection shall not be deemed to limit judicial power to fashion any appropriate remedy in favor of a director adversely affected by a failure to give the notice within the required time period.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of action taken at a meeting of the board of directors and may be described as such in any document.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2005, ch. 51, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), inserted “or shall be sent by electronic transmission by each director” after “by each director” and inserted “shall be” before “included.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), substituted “the requisite number of” for “all” in the first sentence, and, in the last sentence, deleted “either manually, or in facsimile” after “taken, signed”, and substituted “the requisite number of directors” for “each director” both times it appears; rewrote (b) to expand the effective date and description of consent; and substituted “action taken at a meeting of the board of directors” for “a meeting vote” in (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-822.
Notice of meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place or purpose of the meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special meetings of the board of directors shall be preceded by at least two (2) days notice of the date, time and place of the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

§ 17-16-823.
Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice required by this act, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, the waiver shall be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or corporate records.

A director’s attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon his arrival objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “either manually, or in facsimile” after “writing, signed” in (a); and substituted “the director” for “him” after “notice to” in (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-824.
Quorum and voting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require a greater number or unless otherwise specifically provided in this act, a quorum of a board of directors consists of:

A majority of the fixed number of directors if the corporation has a fixed board size; or

A majority of the number of directors prescribed, or if no number is prescribed the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if the corporation has a variable-range size board.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may authorize a quorum of a board of directors to consist of no fewer than one-third (1/3) of the fixed or prescribed number of directors determined under subsection (a) of this section.

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

The right to dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken. A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to the action taken unless:

The director objects at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon his arrival to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting;

The director’s dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

The director delivers written notice of his dissent or abstention to the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment or to the corporation immediately after adjournment of the meeting.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “The director” or variant for “He” or variant in (d).

§ 17-16-825.
Committees.

Unless this act, the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may create one (1) or more committees and appoint one (1) or more members of the board of directors to serve on any committee.

The creation of a committee and appointment of members to it shall be approved by the greater of:

A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

The number of directors required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws to take action under W.S.

17-16-824

.

W.S.

17-16-820

through

17-16-824

apply to committees and their members as well.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, each committee may exercise the authority of the board of directors under W.S.

17-16-801

.

A committee may not, unless specifically authorized by the board of directors:

Authorize or approve distributions except according to a formula or method, or within limits, prescribed by the board of directors;

Approve or propose to shareholders action that this act requires to be approved by shareholders;

Fill vacancies on the board of directors or, subject to subsection (g) of this section, on any of its committees;

Adopt, amend or repeal bylaws.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in W.S.

17-16-830

.

The board of directors may appoint one (1) or more directors as alternate members of any committee to replace any absent or disqualified member during the member’s absence or disqualification. Unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws or the resolution creating the committee provide otherwise, in the event of the absence or disqualification of a member of a committee, the member or members present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, unanimously, may appoint another director to act in place of the absent or disqualified member.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2004 amendment

inserted “to” in (e)(ii).

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a) to change the procedure for creation and membership of committees; deleted “which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board of directors” after “through

17-16-824

” in (c); rewrote (e)(i), which read: “Authorize distributions.”; rewrote (e)(iii), which read: “Fill vacancies on the board of directors or on any of its committees”; repealed former (e)(iv), which read: “Amend articles of incorporation pursuant to
W.S.

17-16-1002

; repealed former (e)(vi) through (e)(viii) which covered approval of merger plans, reacquisition of shares, and issuance or sale or contract for sale of shares, or determine the designation and relative rights, preferences and limitations of shares”; and added (g).

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of stockholders' agreement allegedly infringing on directors' management powers — modern cases, 15 ALR4th 1078.